Utah statutes.
53-13-110.   Duties to investigate specified instances of abuse or neglect.

In accordance with the requirements of Section 62A-4a-202.5, law enforcement officers shall investigate alleged instances of abuse or neglect of a child that occur while the child is in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services, within the Department of Human Services.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 282, 1998 General Session

